Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1407
Actions by state; liability; sections, how construed.

In the event that the state shall be the sole occupier of any building furnished by the municipality or the sole user of a facility furnished by the municipality, the municipality shall not be liable in tort, contract or otherwise for actions by the state solely by reason of the fact that legal ownership, or title, to such building or facility may be in such municipality; Provided, that the provisions of this section shall not be deemed or construed in any way to affect any rights of holders of bonds of a municipality issued to finance such building or facility or the obligations of the municipality to the holders of such bonds.

Laws 1967, c. 464, § 7, p. 1442.